California, session 20252026, SB1264.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 9202 of the Probate Code is amended to read:9202. (a) Not later than 90 days after the date letters are first issued to a general personal representative, the general personal representative or estate attorney shall give the Director of the State Department of Health Care Services notice of the decedent’s death in the manner provided in Section 215, or submitted electronically to the director through the department’s official internet website using the online notice of death form, if the general personal representative knows or has reason to believe that the decedent received health care under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or was the surviving spouse of a person who received that health care. The director has four months after notice is given in which to file a claim.(b) Not later than 90 days after the date letters are first issued to a general personal representative, the general personal representative or estate attorney shall give the Director of the California Victim Compensation Board notice of the decedent’s death in the manner provided in Section 216 if the general personal representative or estate attorney knows that an heir or beneficiary is or has previously been confined in a prison or facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or confined in any county or city jail, road camp, industrial farm, or other local correctional facility. The director of the board shall have four months after that notice is received in which to pursue collection of any outstanding restitution fines or orders.(c) (1) Not later than 90 days after the date letters are first issued to a general personal representative, the general personal representative or estate attorney shall give the Franchise Tax Board notice of the administration of the estate. The notice shall be given as provided in Section 1215.(2) The provisions of this subdivision shall apply to estates for which letters are first issued on or after July 1, 2008.(d) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as requiring the estate attorney, the beneficiary, the personal representative, or the person in possession of property of the decedent to conduct an additional investigation to determine whether a decedent has an heir or beneficiary who has been confined in a prison or facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or its Division of Juvenile Facilities, or confined in any county or city jail, road camp, industrial farm, or other local correctional facility.(e) (1) Not later than 90 days after the date letters are first issued to a general personal representative, the general personal representative or estate attorney shall give notice of the decedent’s death to the Director of the California Department of Child Support Services, in the manner provided by Section 1215, or submitted electronically to the director through the department’s official internet website in a manner to be determined by the department, if the general personal representative or estate attorney knows or has reason to believe has actual knowledge that the decedent had a child support obligation under an order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction. jurisdiction or that a child of the decedent who is an heir or a beneficiary of the estate has a child support obligation under an order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.(2) This subdivision does not impose a duty on a personal representative or estate attorney to investigate whether or not a decedent or a child of the decedent is subject to a child support order.(2)(3) A local child support agency providing services pursuant to Division 17 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Family Code may assert a claim pursue collection no later than four months after receiving delivery of notice under this subdivision.(3)(4) This subdivision applies to estates for which letters are first issued on or after January 1, 2026. 2027.SECTION 1.Section 815.1 of the Civil Code is amended to read:815.1.For the purposes of this chapter, “conservation easement” means any limitation in a deed, will, or other instrument in the form of an easement, restriction, covenant, or condition, that is or has been executed by or on behalf of the owner of the land subject to the easement and is binding upon successive owners of that land, for the purpose of retaining land predominantly in its natural, scenic, historical, agricultural, forested, or open-space condition.